Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 47.12.980.
Grants-in-aid.

The department may accept grants-in-aid from the federal government or private foundations and may accept other gifts consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.12.988.
Implementation of provisions by an entity selected by department.

In this chapter, when authority exercised by the department may also be exercised by an entity selected by the department, the entity that the department may select in order to exercise authority is limited to

a municipality;

a corporation; or

two or more persons recognized by the community and operating under contract or license from the department.

History.

(§ 44 ch 107 SLA 1998)

Sec. 47.12.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“court” means the superior court of the state;

“crime against a person” means an offense set out in AS 11.41;

“delinquent minor” means a minor found to be within the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.12.020

;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“gravely disabled” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

;

“juvenile detention facility” means a secure facility for the detention of delinquent minors in the custody of the department under AS

47.12.240

or

47.12.250

;

“juvenile probation officer” means an officer described in AS

47.12.270

;

“juvenile treatment facility” means a secure facility for treatment of minors adjudicated delinquent and committed by a court to the care and custody of the department under AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

;

“mental health professional” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

, except that, if the minor is placed in another state by the department, “mental health professional” also includes a professional listed in the definition of “mental health professional” in AS

47.30.915

who is not licensed to practice by a board of this state but is licensed by a corresponding licensing authority to practice in the state in which the minor is placed;

“mental illness” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

;

“minor” means a person who is

under 18 years of age at the time the person commits an offense; and

subject to the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“residential child care facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.32.900

;

“secure residential psychiatric treatment center” has the meaning given “residential psychiatric treatment center” in AS

47.32.900

;

“temporary secure juvenile holding area” means separate quarters that are used for the temporary detention of delinquent minors pending a court order or transportation to a juvenile detention facility and that are not within sight or sound of any adult prisoners;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 45 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 25 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 32 ch 64 SLA 2005; am §§ 44 — 46, 56 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998 and 2021, the paragraphs in this section were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in paragraph (10) added the language beginning “, except that” to the end of the paragraph.

The second 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference and inserted “’residential psychiatric treatment center”’ in paragraph (14).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (7), substituted “a secure facility” for “separate quarters within a city jail used” following “means”, added “in the custody of the department under AS

47.12.240

or

47.12.250

” at the end; repealed former (8) and (9); in (12), in the introductory language, added “who is” at the end, in (12)(A), added “at the time the person commits an offense; and” at the end, added (12)(B), and made related changes; repealed (15); added (17) – (20) [now (8), (9), (14), (16)].